src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/N-I-aaapani_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - aaapani - ok : # -m inanimate noun, blood AEW NA1
     aaapani+NI+Sg: aaapani
     aaapani+NI+Pl: aaapaistsi
     aaapani+NI+Non: aaapai

     aaapani+NI+Px1Sg+Sg: [ nitsaapani, nitsaapaimi ]
     aaapani+NI+Px1Sg+Pl: [ nitsaapaistsi, nitsaapaimistsi ]
     aaapani+NI+Px1Sg+Non: [ nitsaapai, nitsaapaimi ]

     aaapani+NI+Px1Pl+Sg: [ nitsaapannaani, nitsaapaiminnaani ]
     aaapani+NI+Px1Pl+Pl: [ nitsaapannaanistsi, nitsaapaiminnaanistsi ]
     aaapani+NI+Px1Pl+Non: [ nitsaapannaani, nitsaapaiminnaani ]

     aaapani+NI+Px21Pl+Sg: [ kitsaapannooni, kitsaapaiminnooni ]
     aaapani+NI+Px21Pl+Pl: [ kitsaapannoonistsi, kitsaapaiminnoonistsi ]
     aaapani+NI+Px21Pl+Non: [ kitsaapannooni, kitsaapaiminnooni ]

     aaapani+NI+Px2Sg+Sg: [ kitsaapani, kitsaapaimi ]
     aaapani+NI+Px2Sg+Pl: [ kitsaapaistsi, kitsaapaimistsi ]
     aaapani+NI+Px2Sg+Non: [ kitsaapai, kitsaapaimi ]

     aaapani+NI+Px2Pl+Sg: [ kitsaapawaawayi, kitsaapaimoaawayi ]
     aaapani+NI+Px2Pl+Pl: [ kitsaapawaawaistsi, kitsaapaimoaawaistsi ]
     aaapani+NI+Px2Pl+Non: [ kitsaapawaawai, kitsaapaimoaawai ]

     aaapani+NI+Px3Sg+Sg: [ otsaapani, otsaapaimi ]
     aaapani+NI+Px3Sg+Pl: [ otsaapaistsi, otsaapaimistsi ]
     aaapani+NI+Px3Sg+Non: [ otsaapai, otsaapaimi ]

     aaapani+NI+Px3Pl+Sg: [ otsaapawaawayi, otsaapaimoaawayi ]
     aaapani+NI+Px3Pl+Pl: [ otsaapawaawaistsi, otsaapaimoaawaistsi ]
     aaapani+NI+Px3Pl+Non: [ otsaapawaawai, otsaapaimoaawai ]
     
     PS/mi'k+aaapani+NI+Sg: mi'ksaapani
